Utah statutes.
75-7-302.   Representation by holder of general testamentary power of
appointment.
To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the holder of a general
testamentary power of appointment and the persons represented with respect to
the particular question or dispute, the holder may represent and bind persons
whose interests, as permissible appointees, takers in default, or otherwise,
are subject to the power.
